Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1331
Unauthorized use of receptacle; penalty; separate offense.

(1) A person commits unauthorized use of receptacle if he fills any receptacle bearing a name, mark, or device recorded as provided in section 28-1330 with soda water, mineral or aerated waters, cider, ginger ale and other unintoxicating beverages, milk, buttermilk, cream, ice cream or butter, or to deface, erase, obliterate, cover up or otherwise remove or conceal any such name, mark, or device on any such receptacle, or to buy, sell, give, take, dispose of in any way, traffic in or destroy any receptacle bearing any such name, mark, or device unless it is the person named in the certificate issued by the Secretary of State, as provided in section 28-1330, or has the written consent of the person named in such certificate.

(2) Unauthorized use of receptacles is a Class III misdemeanor. Each such receptacle so unlawfully dealt with, as herein set out, shall be deemed to be a separate offense.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 315.